North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-33 Nonprofit Corporations
10-33-111.
Discontinuance of dissolution proceedings.

The involuntary or supervised voluntary dissolution of a corporation must be discontinued at any time during the dissolution proceedings when it is established that cause for dissolution no longer exists. When this is established, the court shall dismiss the proceedings and direct the receiver, if any, to redeliver to the corporation all its remaining property and assets.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-112.
Decree of dissolution.

In an involuntary or supervised voluntary dissolution, the court shall provide for the discharge of obligations and the distribution of the assets as set forth in subsection 4 of section 10-33-108 and shall enter a decree dissolving the corporation.

When the decree dissolving the corporation has been entered, the corporation is dissolved.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-113.
Filing decree.

After the court enters a decree dissolving a corporation, the clerk of court shall cause a certified copy of the decree to be filed with the secretary of state. The secretary of state may not charge a fee for filing the decree.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-114.
Deposit with administrator of abandoned property of amount due certain persons — Appropriation.

Upon dissolution of a corporation, the portion of the assets distributable to a person who is unknown or cannot be found must be reduced to money and deposited with the administrator of abandoned property for disposition pursuant to chapter 47-30.2. The amount deposited is appropriated to the administrator of abandoned property and must be paid over to the person or a legal representative, upon proof satisfactory to the administrator of abandoned property of a right to payment.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2021, ch. 337, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

10-33-115.
Claims barred — Exceptions.

A person who is or becomes a creditor or claimant at any time before, during, or following the conclusion of dissolution proceedings, who does not file a claim or pursue a remedy in a legal, administrative, or arbitration proceeding within the time provided in section 10-33-101, 10-33-102, 10-33-106, 10-33-107, or 10-33-110, or has not begun a legal, administrative, or arbitration proceeding before the beginning of the dissolution proceedings, and a person claiming through or under the creditor or claimant, is barred from suing on that claim or otherwise realizing upon or enforcing it, except as provided in this section.

At any time within one year after articles of dissolution have been filed with the secretary of state under subsection 4 of section 10-33-101 or subsection 1 of section 10-33-102 or a decree of dissolution has been entered, a creditor or claimant who shows good cause for not having previously filed the claim may apply to a court in this state to allow a claim against the corporation to the extent of undistributed assets.

All known contractual debts, obligations, and liabilities incurred during dissolution proceedings must be paid by the corporation before the distribution of assets under section 10-33-105. A person to whom this kind of debt, obligation, or liability is owed but not paid may pursue any remedy against the officers or directors of the corporation before the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations. This subsection does not apply to dissolution under the supervision or order of a court.

All other statutory and common-law rights of persons who may bring claims of injury to a person, including death, are not affected by dissolution under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2009, ch. 106, § 53.

10-33-116.
Right to sue or defend after dissolution.

After a corporation has been dissolved, any of its former officers, directors, or members with voting rights may assert or defend, in the name of the corporation, any claim by or against the corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-117.
Omitted assets.

Title to assets remaining after payment of all debts, obligations, or liabilities and after all distributions pursuant to section 10-33-105 may be transferred by a court in this state.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-118.
Extension after duration expired.

A corporation whose period of duration as provided in the articles has expired and which has continued to operate despite that expiration may reinstate its articles and extend the period of corporate duration, including making the duration perpetual, within one year after the date of expiration by filing an amendment to the articles as set forth in this section.

An amendment to the articles must be approved by the board and must include:

The date on which the period of duration expired under the articles;

A statement that the period of duration will be perpetual or, if some shorter period is to be provided, the date to which the period of duration is extended;

A statement that the corporation has been in continuous operation since before the date of expiration of its original period of duration; and

A name change if the name of the corporation has been adopted for use or reserved by another person.

If the corporation has a member with voting rights, the amendment to the articles must be presented, after notice, to a meeting of the members with voting rights. The amendment is adopted when approved by the members with voting rights pursuant to section 10-33-15.

Articles of amendment conforming to section 10-33-16, together with any fees and delinquent filings and reports, must be filed with the secretary of state.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-119.
Effect of extension.

Filing with the secretary of state of articles of amendment extending the period of duration of a corporation:

Relates back to the date of expiration of the original period of duration of the corporation as provided in the articles;

Validates contracts or other acts within the authority of the articles, and the corporation is liable for those contracts or acts; and

Restores to the corporation all the assets and rights of the corporation to the extent they were held by the corporation before expiration of its original period of duration, except those sold or otherwise distributed after that time.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-120.
Service of process on corporation, foreign corporation, and nonresident directors.

Any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the corporation, the foreign corporation, or a director may be served as provided in section 10-01.1-13.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 114; 2005, ch. 100, § 108; 2007, ch. 99, § 47.

10-33-121.
State interested — Proceedings.

If it appears at any stage of a proceeding in a court in this state that the state is, or is likely to be, interested therein, or that it is a matter of general public interest, the court shall order that a copy of the complaint or petition be served upon the attorney general in the same manner prescribed for serving a summons in a civil action. The attorney general shall intervene in a proceeding when the attorney general determines that the public interest requires it, whether or not the attorney general has been served.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-122.
Attorney general — Notice to — Waiting period.

Except as provided in subsection 7, the following corporations shall notify the attorney general of their intent to dissolve, merge, or consolidate, or to transfer all or substantially all of their assets:

A corporation that holds assets for a charitable purpose.

A corporation that is exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

The notice must be signed on behalf of the corporation by an authorized person and must include:

The purpose of the corporation that is giving the notice;

A list of assets owned or held by the corporation for charitable purposes;

A description of restricted assets and purposes for which the assets were received;

A description of debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation;

A description of tangible assets being converted to cash and the manner in which they will be sold;

Anticipated expenses of the transaction, including attorney’s fees;

A list of persons to whom assets will be transferred, if known;

The purposes of persons receiving the assets; and

The terms, conditions, or restrictions, if any, to be imposed on the transferred assets.

Subject to subsection 4, a corporation described in subsection 1 may not transfer or convey assets as part of a dissolution, merger, or consolidation, or transfer of assets under section 10-33-94 until forty-five days after it has given written notice to the attorney general, unless the attorney general waives all or part of the waiting period.

The attorney general may extend the waiting period under subsection 3 for one additional thirty-day period by notifying the corporation in writing of the extension. The attorney general shall notify the secretary of state if the waiting period is extended.

When all or substantially all of the assets of a corporation described in subsection 1 have been transferred or conveyed following expiration or waiver of the waiting period, the board shall deliver to the attorney general a list of persons to whom the assets were transferred or conveyed. The list must include the addresses of each person who received assets and show what assets the person received.

Failure of the attorney general to take an action with respect to a transaction under this section does not constitute approval of the transaction and does not prevent the attorney general from taking other action.

Subsections 1 through 5 do not apply to a merger with, consolidation into, or transfer of assets to an organization exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, or any successor section. A corporation that is exempt under this subsection shall send a copy of the certificate of merger or certificate of consolidation and incorporation to the attorney general.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-123.
Powers of attorney general.

When it appears to the attorney general it is in the public interest that an investigation should be made to ascertain whether a proceeding by the attorney general, as provided in this chapter, should be commenced, the attorney general may:

Examine under oath any person in connection with the affairs of the corporation.

Examine any record, book, account, or paper as the attorney general determines necessary.

Pursuant to an order of the district court, impound any record, book, account, or paper, and retain it in the attorney general’s possession until the completion of all proceedings undertaken under this chapter.

To accomplish the objectives and to carry out the duties provided by this chapter, the attorney general may issue subpoenas to any person.

If any person fails or refuses to file any statement or report, or obey any subpoena, the attorney general may apply to the district court for an order enforcing the subpoena or other investigation demand. Failure to comply with the order of the district court is contempt of court.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2005, ch. 100, § 109.

10-33-124.
Certified nonprofit development corporation — Application.

For the purposes of this section:

“Certified nonprofit development corporation” means a corporation organized under this chapter which meets the following requirements:

Is certified by the secretary of state under this section;

Invests a majority of its funds in primary sector businesses; and

No part of the income is distributable to its members, directors, or officers.

“Primary sector business” has the meaning provided in section 1-01-49.

A corporation may apply to the secretary of state to become a certified nonprofit development corporation by submitting an application executed by an officer of the corporation containing:

The name of the corporation and the address of its principal executive office;

The names and addresses of the officers and directors of the corporation; and

A statement that the corporation has adopted a resolution to invest a majority of membership payments, dues, or contributions received in primary sector businesses. A copy of the resolution must be submitted with the application to the secretary of state together with the fees provided in section 10-33-140.

Upon receipt by the secretary of state of the completed application and fee, the secretary of state shall certify the applicant as a certified nonprofit development corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2009, ch. 545, § 2; 2017, ch. 85, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2016; 2017, ch. 56, § 3, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2016.

Note.

Section 10-33-124 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly.

Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 3 of Chapter 56, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1044; and Section 1 of Chapter 85, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1048.

10-33-125.
Foreign corporation — Governing law.

Subject to the constitution of this state, the laws of the jurisdiction under which a foreign corporation is incorporated govern its incorporation and internal affairs. Nothing in this chapter authorizes this state to regulate the incorporation or internal affairs of a foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation may not be denied a certificate of authority to conduct activities in this state by reason of any difference between those laws and the laws of this state.

A foreign corporation holding a valid certificate of authority in this state has no greater rights and privileges than a corporation. The certificate of authority does not authorize the foreign corporation to exercise any of its powers or purposes that a corporation is forbidden by law to exercise in this state.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-126.
Foreign corporation — Name.

A foreign corporation may apply for a certificate of authority under any name that would be available to a corporation, whether or not the name is the name under which it is authorized in its jurisdiction of incorporation. A trade name must be registered as provided in chapter 47-25 when applying for the certificate of authority under a name other than the name as authorized in the jurisdiction of incorporation.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-127.
Foreign corporation — Admission of foreign corporation conducting activities — Obtaining licenses and permits.

A foreign corporation may not:

Conduct activities in this state or obtain any license or permit required by this state until it has procured a certificate of authority from the secretary of state.

Conduct in this state any activity that is prohibited to a corporation incorporated under this chapter.

Be denied a certificate of authority because the laws of the state or country where the corporation is incorporated differ from the laws of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-128.
Foreign corporation application for certificate of authority.

An applicant for the certificate shall file with the secretary of state a certificate of status from the filing office in the jurisdiction in which the foreign corporation is incorporated and an application executed by an authorized person and setting forth:

The name of the foreign corporation and, if different, the name under which it proposes to conduct activities in this state;

The jurisdiction of its incorporation;

The date of incorporation in the jurisdiction of its incorporation and the period of duration of the foreign corporation;

The address of the principal executive office of the foreign corporation in the jurisdiction where it is incorporated;

The name of the registered agent of the foreign corporation as provided in chapter 10-01.1 and, if a noncommercial registered agent, then the address of that noncommercial registered agent in this state;

The purpose or purposes of the foreign corporation which it proposes to pursue in conducting its activities in this state;

The names and addresses of the directors and officers of the foreign corporation; and

Any additional information deemed necessary or appropriate by the secretary of state to enable the secretary of state to determine whether the foreign corporation is entitled to a certificate of authority to conduct activities in this state.

The application must be accompanied by payment of the fees provided in section 10-33-140 together with a certificate of good standing or a certificate of existence duly authenticated by the incorporating officer of the state or country where the corporation is incorporated.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 115; 2007, ch. 99, § 48.

10-33-129.
Foreign corporation — Issuance of certificate of authority.

If the secretary of state finds that an application for a certificate of authority conforms to law and that all fees have been paid, the secretary shall:

Endorse on the application the word “filed” and the date of the filing;

File the application and the certificate of good standing or certificate of existence; and

Issue to the corporation or its representative a certificate of authority to conduct activities in this state.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2007, ch. 99, § 49.

10-33-130.
Foreign corporation — Amendments to the certificate of authority.

If any statement in the application for a certificate of authority by a foreign corporation is false when made or any arrangements or other facts described change, making the application inaccurate in any respect, the foreign corporation shall promptly file with the secretary of state an application for an amended certificate of authority executed by an authorized person correcting the statement and, in the case of a change in the foreign corporation’s name, a certificate to that effect authenticated by the proper officer of the jurisdiction under the laws of which the foreign corporation is incorporated. In the case of a dissolution or merger, a foreign corporation that is not the surviving organization need not file an application for an amended certificate of authority but shall promptly file with the secretary of state a certificate to that effect authenticated by the proper officer of the jurisdiction under the laws of which the foreign corporation is incorporated. A foreign nonprofit corporation that changes the foreign nonprofit corporation’s name and applies for an amended certificate of authority and that is the owner of a service mark, trademark, or trade name, a general partner named in a fictitious name certificate, a general partner in a limited partnership or a limited liability limited partnership, or a managing partner in a limited liability partnership that is on file with the secretary of state shall change the foreign nonprofit corporation’s name in each of the foregoing registrations that apply if the foreign nonprofit corporation files an application for an amended certificate of authority.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 1999, ch. 95, § 143; 2009, ch. 106, § 54.

10-33-131.
Foreign corporation — Registered agent — Registered office.

A foreign corporation authorized to conduct activities in this state shall continuously maintain a registered agent and registered office in this state as provided in chapter 10-01.1.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2007, ch. 99, § 50.

10-33-132.
Foreign corporation — Merger of foreign corporation authorized to conduct activities in this state.

Whenever a foreign corporation authorized to conduct activities in this state is a party to a statutory merger permitted by the laws of the jurisdiction under which it is incorporated, and the corporation is not the surviving organization, the surviving organization shall, within thirty days after the merger becomes effective, file with the secretary of state a certified statement of merger duly authenticated by the proper officer of the state or country where the statutory merger was effected. It is not necessary for any foreign organization, which is the surviving organization in a merger, to procure either a new or amended certificate of authority to conduct activities in this state unless the name of the organization is changed thereby or unless the organization desires to pursue in this state purposes other than those which it is authorized to transact in this state.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-133.
Foreign corporation — Certificate of withdrawal.

A foreign corporation authorized to conduct activities in this state may withdraw from this state upon procuring from the secretary of state a certificate of withdrawal. In order to procure the certificate, the foreign corporation shall file with the secretary of state an application for withdrawal, together with the fees provided in section 10-33-140, which must set forth:

The name of the corporation and the state or country under the laws of which it is incorporated;

That the corporation is not conducting activities in this state;

That the corporation surrenders its authority to conduct activities in this state;

That service of process in any action, suit, or proceeding based upon any cause of action arising in this state during the time the corporation was authorized to conduct activities in this state may thereafter be made on such corporation as provided in section 10-01.1-13; and

A post-office address to which a person may mail a copy of any process against the corporation.

The filing with the secretary of state of a certificate of dissolution, or a certificate of merger if the corporation is not the surviving organization, from the proper officer of the state or country under the laws of which the corporation is incorporated constitutes a valid application of withdrawal and the authority of the corporation to conduct activities in this state shall cease upon filing of the certificate.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2007, ch. 99, § 51.

10-33-134.
Foreign corporation — Revocation of certificate of authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2005, ch. 100, § 110; 2007, ch. 99, § 52; 2011, ch. 87, § 59; repealed by 2015, ch. 86, § 24, effective August 1, 2015.

10-33-135.
Foreign corporation — Conduct of activity without certificate of authority — Civil penalty.

A foreign corporation conducting activities in this state may not maintain any action, suit, or proceeding in any court of this state until it possesses a certificate of authority.

The failure of a foreign corporation to obtain a certificate of authority does not impair the validity of any contract or act of the foreign corporation or prevent the foreign corporation from defending any action, suit, or proceeding in any court of this state.

A foreign corporation, by conducting activities in this state without a certificate of authority, appoints the secretary of state as its agent upon whom any notice, process, or demand may be served.

A foreign corporation that conducts activities in this state without a valid certificate of authority is liable to the state for the years or parts of years during which it conducted activities in this state without the certificate in an amount equal to all fees that would have been imposed by this chapter upon that corporation had it duly obtained the certificate, filed all reports required by this chapter, and paid all penalties imposed by this chapter. The attorney general shall bring proceedings to recover all amounts due this state under this section.

A foreign corporation that conducts activities in this state without a valid certificate of authority is subject to a civil penalty, payable to the state, not to exceed five thousand dollars. Each director and each officer or agent who authorizes, directs, or participates in the conduct of activity in this state on behalf of a foreign corporation that does not have a certificate is subject to a civil penalty, payable to the state, not to exceed one thousand dollars.

The civil penalties set forth in subsection 5 may be recovered in an action brought within the district court of Burleigh County by the attorney general. Upon a finding by the court that a foreign corporation or any of its members, directors, officers, or agents have conducted activities in this state in violation of this chapter, the court shall issue, in addition to the imposition of a civil penalty, an injunction restraining the further conduct of the activity of the foreign corporation and the further exercise of any rights and privileges by the corporation in this state. The foreign corporation must be enjoined from conducting activities in this state until all civil penalties plus any interest and court costs that the court may assess have been paid and until the foreign corporation has otherwise complied with this chapter.

A member of a foreign corporation is not liable for the debts and obligations of the corporation solely by reason of the corporation having conducted activity in this state without a valid certificate of authority.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-136.
Foreign corporation — Conduct not constituting conducting activities.

The following activities of a foreign corporation, among others, do not constitute conducting activity within the meaning of this chapter:

Maintaining, defending, or settling any proceeding;

Holding meetings of its members or carrying on any other activities concerning its internal affairs;

Maintaining bank accounts;

Creating or acquiring indebtedness, mortgages, and security interests in real or personal property;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages and security interests in property securing the debts; or

Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within thirty days and that is not one in the course of repeated transactions of a like manner.

The term “conducting activity” as used in this section has no effect on personal jurisdiction under the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure.

For purposes of this section, any foreign corporation that owns income-producing real or tangible personal property in this state, other than property exempted under subsection 1, is considered conducting activity in this state.

The list of activities in subsection 1 is not exhaustive. This section does not apply in determining the contracts or activities that may subject a foreign corporation to service of process or taxation in this state or to regulation under any other law of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-137.
Foreign corporation — Action by attorney general.

The attorney general may bring an action to restrain a foreign corporation from conducting activity in this state in violation of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-138.
Foreign corporation — Service of process.

Service of process on a foreign corporation must be as provided in section 10-01.1-13.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2005, ch. 100, § 111; 2007, ch. 99, § 53.

10-33-139.
Secretary of state — Annual report of corporations and foreign corporations.

Each corporation, and each foreign corporation authorized to conduct activities in this state, shall file, within the time provided in subsection 3, an annual report setting forth:

The name of the corporation or foreign corporation and the state or country under the laws of which it is incorporated.

The address of the registered office of the corporation or foreign corporation in this state, the name of its registered agent in this state at that address, and the address of its principal executive office.

A brief statement of the character of the activities in which the corporation or foreign corporation is actually engaged in this state.

The names and respective addresses of the officers and directors of the corporation or foreign corporation.

The section of the Internal Revenue Code by which its tax status is established.

The annual report must be submitted on forms prescribed by the secretary of state. The information provided must be given as of the date of the execution of the report. The annual report must be signed as provided in subsection 34 of section 10-33-01 or in the articles or bylaws, or in a resolution approved by the affirmative vote of the required proportion or number of the directors or members entitled to vote. If the corporation or foreign corporation is in the hands of a receiver or trustee, it must be signed on behalf of the corporation or foreign corporation by the receiver or trustee. The secretary of state may destroy all annual reports provided for in this section after they have been on file for six years.

Except for the first annual report, the annual report of a nonprofit corporation or a foreign nonprofit corporation must be delivered to the secretary of state before February second of each year. The first annual report of a nonprofit corporation must be delivered before February second of the year following the calendar year of the effective date stated in the articles of incorporation, and the first annual report of a foreign nonprofit corporation must be delivered before February second of the year following the calendar year in which the certificate of authority was issued by the secretary of state. The secretary of state must file the report if the report conforms to the requirements of subsection 2.

If the report does not conform, it must be returned to the corporation for any necessary corrections.

If the report is filed before the deadlines provided in this subsection, penalties for the failure to file a report within the time provided do not apply, if the report is corrected to conform to the requirements of subsection 2 and returned to the secretary of state within thirty days after the annual report was returned by the secretary of state for correction.

After the date established under subsection 3, the secretary of state shall notify any corporation or foreign corporation failing to file its annual report that its certificate of incorporation or certificate of authority is not in good standing and that it may be dissolved or revoked pursuant to subsections 5 and 6. The secretary of state must mail the notice to the last registered agent at the last registered office. If the corporation or foreign corporation files its annual report after the notice is mailed, together with the annual report filing fee and late filing penalty fee as provided in section 10-33-140, the secretary of state shall restore its certificate of incorporation or certificate of authority to good standing.

A corporation that does not file its annual report, along with the statutory filing and penalty fees, within one year after the date established in subsection 3 ceases to exist and is considered involuntarily dissolved by operation of law.

Thereafter, the secretary of state shall note the termination of the corporation’s certificate of incorporation on the records of the secretary of state and shall give notice of the action to the dissolved corporation.

Notice by the secretary of state must be mailed to the last registered agent at the last registered office.

A foreign corporation that does not file its annual report, along with the statutory filing and penalty fees, within one year after the date established by subsection 3 forfeits its authority to conduct activities in this state.

The secretary of state shall note the revocation of the foreign corporation’s certificate of authority on the records of the secretary of state and shall give notice of the action to the foreign corporation.

Notice by the secretary of state must be mailed to the foreign corporation’s last registered agent at the last registered office.

The decision by the secretary of state that a certificate of authority must be revoked under this subsection is final.

A corporation that was dissolved for failure to file an annual report, or a foreign corporation whose authority was forfeited by failure to file an annual report, may be reinstated by filing a past-due report, together with the statutory filing and penalty fees for an annual report and a reinstatement fee as provided in section 10-33-140. The fees must be paid and the report filed within one year following the involuntary dissolution or revocation. Reinstatement under this subsection does not affect the rights or liability for the time from the dissolution or revocation to the reinstatement.

The secretary of state may waive any penalties provided in this section when an annual report form could not be delivered to the corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 116; 2005, ch. 100, § 112; 2007, ch. 99, § 54; 2009, ch. 106, § 55; 2019, ch. 92, § 10, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 85, § 15, effective August 1, 2021.

10-33-140.
Secretary of state — Fees and charges. [Contingent effective date – See note]

The secretary of state shall charge and collect for:

Filing articles of incorporation and issuing a certificate of incorporation, forty dollars.

Filing articles of amendment, twenty dollars.

Filing statement of correction, twenty dollars.

Filing restated articles of incorporation, thirty dollars.

Filing articles of merger or consolidation and issuing a certificate of merger or consolidation, fifty dollars.

Filing an intent to dissolve, ten dollars.

Filing articles of dissolution, twenty dollars.

Filing a statement of change of address of registered office or change of registered agent, or both, the fee provided in section 10-01.1-03.

Filing an application to reserve a corporate name, ten dollars.

Filing a notice of transfer of a reserved corporate name, ten dollars.

Filing a cancellation of reserved corporate name, ten dollars.

Filing a consent to use a name, ten dollars.

Filing an application of a foreign corporation for a certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this state and issuing a certificate of authority, fifty dollars.

Filing an application of a foreign corporation for an amended certificate of authority, forty dollars.

Filing a certified statement of merger of a foreign corporation holding a certificate of authority to conduct activities in this state, fifty dollars.

Filing an application for withdrawal of a foreign corporation and issuing a certificate of withdrawal, twenty dollars.

Filing an annual report of a domestic or foreign corporation, ten dollars.

The secretary of state shall charge and collect additional fees for late filing of the annual report:

After the date provided in subsection 3 of section 10-33-139, five dollars; and

After the dissolution of a corporation, or the revocation of the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation, the reinstatement fee of forty dollars.

Fees paid to the secretary of state according to this subdivision are not refundable if an annual report submitted to the secretary of state cannot be filed because it lacks information required by section 10-33-139, or the annual report lacks sufficient payment as required by this subdivision.

Submitting any record for approval before the actual time of submission for filing, one-half of the fee provided in this subsection for filing the record.

Filing any other statement of a domestic or foreign corporation, ten dollars.

The secretary of state shall charge and collect:

For furnishing a certified copy of any record, instrument, or paper relating to a corporation, the fee provided in section 54-09-04 for copying a record and fifteen dollars for the certificate and affixing the seal to the certificate.

At the time of any service of process on the secretary of state as resident agent of a corporation, twenty-five dollars, which may be recovered as taxable costs by the party to the claim for relief causing the service to be made if that party prevails in the suit or action.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2005, ch. 100, § 113; 2007, ch. 99, § 55; 2009, ch. 106, § 56; 2011, ch. 87, § 60; contingently amended by 2019, ch. 93, § 6.

Note.

This section is effective upon receipt by the legislative council of the certification by the secretary of state attesting that all necessary administrative rules and information technology components and systems are ready for implementation of this Act.